tables/de-g0-bd.utb
# liblouis: German Grade 0 Braille (bidirectional) (unofficial and experimental)
#
# Das System der deutschen Blindenschrift (2015/2018)
# http://www.bskdl.org/textschrift.html
#
# Bemerkung:
# - Gross-/Kleinschreibung wird nicht berücksichtigt (d.h. für
#   Abkürzungen u.ä. braucht es Vorprogramm)
# - Akzente: Hinweis auf die beiden Tabellen (bis jetzt nur als
#   Kommentar in de-g0.utb)
#
# Differences between this table (de-g0-bd.utb) and de-g0.utb:
# This table is meant to be used with screen readers and note-takers
# for both forward and backward translation.
# Forward translation in this table is designed to give as much
# information as possible in order for the result to be
# back-translatable.
# Forward translation differs from that of de-g0.utb in the following ways.
# 1. All capital letters are marked.
# 2. Accented letters are translated using de-accents-detailed.cti
#    to make the translation as detailed as possible.
# 3. "`" and "´" are translated as "'" so they won't cover other
#    characters.
#
# -----------
#-name: Deutsche Basisschrift
#-index-name: German, uncontracted, back-translatable
#-display-name: German uncontracted braille (back-translatable)
#
#+locale:de
#+type:literary
#+contraction:no
#+grade:0
#+variant:bidi
#+direction:both
# ------------
#
#  Copyright (C) 2018 SBS Schweizerische Bibliothek für Blinde, Seh- und Lesebehinderte
#  Copyright (C) 2020 Bue Vester-Andersen
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#-------------------------------------------------------------------------------

# must include display table directly to establish Character/dots associations.
include de-eurobrl6.dis

include de-chardefs6.cti
# Detailed accents for better back-translation.
# e.g. without this, every instance of e with any accent will back-translate as €.
include de-accents-detailed.cti
include de-accents.cti
include de-g0-bd-core.uti


# experimental handling of apostrophe by common situations
# Definitely not perfect, but perhaps the best we can currently do.
# Should not be in the core files since patterns may vary with grade.
nofor word ma'alot 134-1-6-1-123-135-2345
nofor begword ' 6
nofor begword d' 145-6
nofor begword l' 123-6
nofor begword o' 135-6
nofor endword ' 6
nofor endword '' 6-6
nofor endword ''' 6-6-6
nofor endword 'm 6-134
nofor endword 'n 6-1345
nofor endword 'ge 6-1245-15
nofor endword 'gem 6-1245-15-134
nofor endword 'gen 6-1245-15-1345
nofor endword 'ges 6-1245-15-234
nofor endword 'sche 6-234-14-125-15
nofor endword 'schen 6-234-14-125-15-1345
nofor endword 'sches 6-234-14-125-15-234
nofor endword ' 6
nofor endword 's 6-234
nofor begword dell' 145-15-123-123-6
